Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-435
Violations; standing to sue.

Any person in this state, including any law enforcement official, who has cause to believe that (1) any licensed organization, (2) any employee or agent of such licensed organization, (3) any person acting in concert with such licensed organization, or (4) any person in connection with a lottery or raffle has engaged in or is engaging in any conduct in violation of the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act or has aided or is aiding another in any conduct in violation of such act may commence a civil action in any district court of this state.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 156.